Vermont, session 2025-2026, H370.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Cryptocurrency Public
Protection Act.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) cryptocurrency is not legal tender, is not backed by the government,
and accounts and value balances are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections;
VT LEG #381084 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.370
2025 Page 2 of 4
(2) legislative and regulatory changes or actions at the State, federal, or
international level may adversely affect the use, transfer, exchange, and value
of cryptocurrency;
(3) transactions in cryptocurrency may be irreversible and, accordingly,
losses due to fraudulent or accidental transactions may not be recoverable;
(4) the value of cryptocurrency may be derived from the continued
willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for
cryptocurrency, which may result in the potential for permanent and total loss
of value of a particular cryptocurrency should the market for the
cryptocurrency disappear; and
(5) the volatility and unpredictability of the price of cryptocurrency
relative to fiat currency may result in significant loss over a short period of
time.
(b) It is the intent of this act to establish regulatory policies that safeguard
public funds, protect consumers from fraudulent activities, promote the public
good, and protect the legitimacy of the U.S. dollar, the reserve currency of the
world.
Sec. 3. PUBLIC PENSION FUNDS; CRYPTOCURRENCY; VERMONT
PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION
(a) The Vermont Pension Investment Commission, in consultation with the
State Treasurer, shall ensure that the holdings of the Vermont State
VT LEG #381084 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.370
2025 Page 3 of 4
Employees’ Retirement System, the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement
System, and the Municipal Employees’ Retirement System are not invested in
cryptocurrency.
(b) If any holdings of such funds are in cryptocurrency on July 1, 2025, the
Commissioner, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall develop and
implement a divestment plan.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 437 is added to read:
§ 437. INVESTMENTS IN CRYPTOCURRENCY PROHIBITED
(a) Investments of State funds, including nonretirement-related trust funds,
shall not be made in cryptocurrency.
(b) If State funds are invested in cryptocurrency on July 1, 2025, the State
Treasurer shall develop and implement a divestment plan.
Sec. 5. FINANCIAL REGULATION AND FRAUD PREVENTION
(a) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation, in consultation with the
Vermont Attorney General, shall develop a regulatory framework designed to
prevent the use of cryptocurrency as a form of theft and fraud and to ensure the
robust enforcement of cryptocurrency-related criminal activities.
(b) On or before November 15, 2025, the Commissioner shall submit in
draft form the regulatory framework developed pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Finance.
VT LEG #381084 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.370
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 6. CRYPTOCURRENCY MINING FACILITIES; PUBLIC UTILITY
COMMISSION INVESTIGATION
(a) The Public Utility Commission shall commence an investigation into
the siting of cryptocurrency mining facilities in Vermont. The purpose of the
investigation is to:
(1) develop a procedure for siting such facilities in accordance with the
State’s environmental and conservation policies and in a manner that mitigates
any adverse impacts on adjacent landowners, municipalities, and the public
good, generally; and
(2) establish electric and water utility rates specific to cryptocurrency
mining facilities so that other classes of ratepayers are not burdened with any
increased costs associated with the construction and operation of such
facilities.
(b) The Public Utility Commission shall submit its findings and
recommendations in draft form to the House Committee on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure and the Senate Committee on Finance on or before November
15, 2025.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381084 v.1